Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB540.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 525.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used[The following definitions apply] in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(1) "Desecrate" means defacing, damaging, polluting, or otherwise physically
mistreating in a way that the actor knows will outrage the sensibilities of persons
likely to observe or discover his or her action;[.]
(2) "Public" means affecting or likely to affect a substantial group of persons;[.]
(3) "Public place" means a place to which the public or a substantial group of persons
has access and includes but is not limited to highways, transportation facilities,
schools, places of amusement[amusements], parks, places of business,
playgrounds, and hallways, lobbies, and other portions of apartment houses and
hotels not constituting rooms or apartments designed for actual residence. An act is
deemed to occur in a public place if it produces its offensive or proscribed
consequences in a public place;[.]
(4) "Religious organization" means an organization, a religious society, a church or
other house of worship, a body of communicants, or a group organized or
operated for religious purposes, regardless of whether it is integrated or affiliated
with a church or other house of worship;
(5) "Religious service" means a meeting, gathering, or assemblage of two (2) or
more persons for the purpose of worship, teaching, training, conducting religious
rituals, or other activities undertaken by a religious organization for the exercise
of religion;["Transportation facility" means any conveyance, premises, or place
used for or in connection with public passenger transportation by air, railroad,
motor vehicle, or any other method. It includes aircraft, watercraft, railroad cars,
buses, and air, boat, railroad, and bus terminals and stations and all appurtenances
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/2/2026 3:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1921
thereto.
]
(6)[(5)] "Riot" means a public disturbance involving an assemblage of five (5) or
more persons which by tumultuous and violent conduct creates grave danger of
damage or injury to property or persons or substantially obstructs law enforcement
or other government function;[.]
(7)[(6)] "Service animal" includes the following[a]:
(a) "Accelerant detection dog," which means a dog that is trained to for
accelerant detection, commonly referred to as arson canines["Bomb
detection dog," which means a dog that is trained to locate bombs or
explosives by scent];
(b) "Assistance dog," which has the same meaning as in KRS
258.500["Electronic detection dog," which means a dog that is trained to
locate electronic devices by scent];
(c) "Bomb detection dog," which means a dog that is trained to locate bombs
or explosives by scent["Narcotic detection dog," which means a dog that is
trained to locate narcotics by scent];
(d) "Cadaver dog," which means a dog that is trained to find human
remains["Patrol dog," which means a dog that is trained to protect a peace
officer and to apprehend a person];
(e) "Electronic detection dog," which means a dog that is trained to locate
electronic devices by scent["Tracking dog," which means a dog that is trained
to track and find a missing person, escaped inmate, or fleeing felon];
(f) "Narcotic detection dog," which means a dog that is trained to locate
narcotics by scent["Search and rescue dog," which means a dog that is trained
to locate lost or missing persons, victims of natural or man-made disasters,
and human bodies];
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/2/2026 3:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1921
(g) "Patrol dog," which means a dog that is trained to protect a peace officer
and to apprehend a person["Accelerant detection dog," which means a dog
that is trained for accelerant detection, commonly referred to as arson
canines];
(h) "Search and rescue dog," which means a dog that is trained to locate lost or
missing persons, victims of natural or man-made disasters, and human
bodies["Cadaver dog," which means a dog that is trained to find human
remains];
(i) "Tracking dog," which means a dog that is trained to track and find a
missing person, escaped inmate, or fleeing felon["Assistance dog," which
has the same meaning as in KRS 258.500];
(j) Any dog that is trained in more than one (1) of the disciplines specified in
paragraphs (a) to (i) of this subsection; or
(k) ["Police dog," which means ]Any animal[dog] that is owned, or the service of
which is employed, by a law enforcement agency as defined in KRS 61.298
for the principal purpose of aiding in detection of criminal activity,
enforcement of laws, and apprehension of offenders; and[; or
(l) "Police horse," which means any horse that is owned, or the service of which is
employed, by a law enforcement agency for the principal purpose of aiding in
detection of criminal activity, enforcement of laws, and apprehension of offenders.]
(8) "Transportation facility":
(a) Means any conveyance, premises, or place used for or in connection with
public passenger transportation by air, railroad, motor vehicle, or any other
method; and
(b) Includes aircraft, watercraft, railroad cars, buses, and air, boat, railroad,
and bus terminals and stations and all appurtenances thereto.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 525 IS CREATED TO
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/2/2026 3:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1921
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of interference with a religious service when, with intent to
prevent or disrupt a religious service held by a religious organization, he or she:
(a) Does any act tending to obstruct, or physically or audibly interfere with, the
religious service or any individual's access to or egress from the service;
(b) Intentionally damages or destroys, or attempts to damage or destroy, the
property of a religious organization; or
(c) By force or threat of force, intentionally injures, intimidates, or interferes
with, or attempts to injure, intimidate, or interfere with, any individual
attending or attempting to attend the religious service.
(2) Interference with a religious service is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person who violates Section 2 of this Act shall be personally liable in a civil
cause of action brought against him or her by:
(a) A victim who was lawfully exercising or seeking to exercise a right of
religious worship; or
(b) The religious organization that was undertaking the religious service.
(2) The action may be filed in the Circuit Court for the county where the alleged
violation occurred or the county where the plaintiff resides.
(3) The court may award appropriate relief including:
(a) Injunctive relief;
(b) Compensatory damages, or at the plaintiff's election prior to the rendering
of final judgment, statutory damages of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for
each violation of Section 2 of this Act;
(c) Costs and expenses, including reasonable expert witness fees; and
(d) Reasonable attorney's fees.
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/2/2026 3:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1921
(4) (a) If the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe that a person or
group of persons is being, has been, or may be injured by conduct
constituting a violation of Section 2 of this Act, the Attorney General may
commence a civil action in the Circuit Court for the county where the
alleged violation occurs, provided an action has not previously been
commenced under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The court may award appropriate relief, including injunctive relief,
compensatory damages, and civil penalties not exceeding twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000) per violation.
(5) A person found liable under this section shall be jointly and severally liable with
each other person, if any, found liable under this section for the damages arising
from the same violation of Section 2 of this Act.
Section 4. KRS 525.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of assault on a service animal in the first degree when, without
legal justification or lawful authority:
(a) He or she intentionally kills or causes serious physical injury to a service
animal;
(b) He or she intentionally causes physical injury to a service animal by means of
a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument; or
(c) He or she wantonly causes serious physical injury to a service animal by
means of a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument.
(2) As used in[For the purposes of] this section, "service animal" [has the same
meaning as in KRS 525.010, except that "service animal" ]does not include an
assistance dog[dogs] as defined in KRS 525.010(7)(b)[(6)(i)].
(3) Assault on a service animal in the first degree is a Class D felony.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/2/2026 3:37 PM Jacketed